Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB151.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "county agency," "department" and "private agency" in section 2 of the act of November 23, 2010 (P.L.1264, No.119), known as the Children in Foster Care Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:<--1234567891011121314151617 "Benefits." Any and all Federal benefits, including Social Security, Supplemental Security Income and veterans benefits.* * *"Cost of care." The reasonable maintenance expenses, including foster care maintenance payments as defined under 42 U.S.C. § 675(4)(A) (relating to definitions), and special allowances for a child of similar age."County agency." A county children and youth social service agency established under section 405 of the act of June 24, 1937 (P.L.2017, No.396), known as the County Institution District Law, and supervised by the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services under Article IX of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the [Public Welfare] Human Services Code."Department." The Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services of the Commonwealth.* * *"Private agency." A children and youth social service agency subject to the regulatory requirements of the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services.* * *"Representative payee." A person designated to receive benefits for a minor child under county agency rules governing the RSDI benefits. * * *"RETIREMENT, SURVIVORS AND DISABILITY INSURANCE BENEFITS" OR "RSDI BENEFITS." THE FEDERAL PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY THE SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION THAT PROVIDES MONTHLY INSURANCE BENEFITS TO ELIGIBLE DEPENDENTS AND SURVIVORS OF INSURED INDIVIDUALS.* * *"Unmet needs." Expenses for which a county agency is not 20250HB0151PN3690 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required by law to provide financial support.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.1. Benefits RSDI BENEFITS . A county agency shall have the following powers and duties:(1) The county agency shall ensure that each child in foster care is screened to determine whether the child is currently receiving or is eligible to receive Social Security, Supplemental Security Income, veterans or other Federal or State RSDI benefits within 60 days of being placed in foster care and annually thereafter.(2) Within 60 90 days of a determination that a child is potentially eligible to receive Social Security, Supplemental Security Income, veterans or other Federal or State RSDI benefits, the county agency shall apply for the RSDI benefits, in cooperation with the child's attorney or guardian ad litem , if the screening determines that the child may be eligible for benefits . (3) If an application for RSDI benefits is denied, the county agency shall appeal the decision.(4) The county agency shall identify, in cooperation with the child's attorney or guardian ad litem, a representative payee in accordance with the established categories of preferred payees as outlined by Social Security and Supplemental Security Income ADMINISTRATION guidelines and apply to become the representative payee if there is no other suitable candidate available.(5) The county agency shall support the maintenance of RSDI benefits for a child transitioning out of foster care or an individual under the county agency's care who has reached 20250HB0151PN3690 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the age of legal adulthood. When a child in foster care reaches 16 14 years and 6 months of age, the county agency shall begin to prepare a plan to support the maintenance of RSDI benefits for the child as the child transitions out of foster care or reaches the age of legal adulthood. If a child's eligibility for benefits ceases upon entering foster care, the county agency shall assist the child and parent, guardian, permanent legal custodian or adoptive parent with the application for benefits upon the child transitioning out of foster care. IF A CHILD'S ELIGIBILITY FOR RSDI BENEFITS WILL CONTINUE UPON THE CHILD'S DISCHARGE OR TRANSITION FROM FOSTER CARE, THE COUNTY AGENCY SHALL ASSIST THE CHILD AND THE PARENT WITH APPLYING AS A REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE FOR THE CHILD. IF THE CHILD HAS ATTAINED 18 YEARS OF AGE AND IS NOT IN NEED OF A REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE, THE COUNTY AGENCY SHALL ASSIST THE CHILD WITH THE CHILD'S APPLICATION TO THE SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION. DURING THE PENDENCY OF THE APPLICATION FOR A NEW REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE, THE COUNTY AGENCY SHALL REMAIN A CHILD'S REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE UNTIL THE CHILD ATTAINS 19 YEARS OF AGE.(6) Notwithstanding 55 Pa. Code Ch. 3140 (relating to planning and financial reimbursement requirements for county children and youth social service programs), if the county agency serves as a representative payee for a child receiving Social Security, Supplemental Security Income, veterans or other Federal or State RSDI benefits, the county agency shall : (i) Use SHALL USE or conserve the RSDI benefits in the child's interest, as determined in cooperation with the child and the child's attorney or guardian ad litem, 20250HB0151PN3690 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including using : (A) USING the benefits for services or unmet needs not otherwise provided by the county agency, court ordered or covered by health insurance or ; OR (B) conserving the RSDI benefits for the child's reasonably foreseeable future needs.(ii) Ensure that for a child in foster care, the child's benefits are not used to reimburse the Commonwealth for the costs of care for the child or other payments made by the Commonwealth to cover any other cost or expense for the child.(iii) Monitor any Federal asset or resource limit for the benefits and ensure that a child's best interest is served by using or conserving the benefits in a way that avoids violating the Federal asset or resource limit, including conserving funds by establishing individual financial accounts in accordance with 20 CFR 416.645 (relating to conservation and investment of benefit payments).(II) MAY NOT USE ANY OF A CHILD'S RSDI BENEFITS TO PAY OR REIMBURSE A COUNTY AGENCY FOR CARE OR SERVICES OF THE CHILD, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, SERVICES COVERED UNDER FOSTER CARE MAINTENANCE PAYMENTS, AS DEFINED UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 675(4) (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) AND PLACEMENT MAINTENANCE, AS DEFINED BY DEPARTMENTAL REGULATION.(III) SHALL RECEIVE AND DOCUMENT CONSENT BEFORE SPENDING RSDI BENEFITS FROM THE CHILD AFTER CONSULTATION WITH THE COUNTY AGENCY, IF ASSIGNED AS THE CHILD'S REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE, AND THE GUARDIAN AD LITEM FOR THE 20250HB0151PN3690 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHILD OR THE CHILD'S LEGAL COUNSEL.(7) Consistent with the best interest of a child in foster care, the county agency shall MONITOR ANY FEDERAL ASSET OR RESOURCE LIMIT AND place the child's RSDI benefits in individual financial accounts that avoid asset limitations for Federal and State programs , such as a PA ABLE savings account . The county agency shall establish individual financial accounts for the purpose of limiting the county agency's use of a child's RSDI benefits. The county agency shall cooperate with the Social Security Administration, the child and the child's attorney or guardian ad litem to ensure that when the child leaves foster care or reaches ATTAINS 18 years of age, THE REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE IMMEDIATELY NOTIFIES THE SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION AND all payments of benefits shall be returned to the Social Security Administration to be held on the child's behalf or, upon the instructions of the Social Security Administration, transferred to the child or a new representative payee. RSDI BENEFITS ARE RELEASED IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS.(8) The county agency shall notify the parent , guardian, permanent legal custodian or adoptive parent and THE child through the child's attorney or guardian ad litem of an application, decision, communication or appeal related to the child's Social Security, Supplemental Security Income, veterans or other Federal or State RSDI benefits. (9) The county agency shall provide MAINTAIN a quarterly accounting of the amount and use of all RSDI benefits that each child in foster care is receiving. The accounting shall contain an itemized list of each expenditure by the county 20250HB0151PN3690 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency, private agency and any third-party representative payee. The accounting shall be provided to the child through the child's attorney or guardian ad litem AND TO THE DEPARTMENT . (10) The county agency shall provide a child in foster care with ongoing financial literacy training tailored to the individual child's development, functioning and needs and support in maintaining benefit eligibility, including providing information regarding the existence, availability and use of money conserved for the child. The training and support shall be provided when a child in foster care reaches 14 years of age or within six months of being placed in foster care for children over 14 years of age. Financial literacy training concerning restrictions on the use of conserved money shall be made available to all parents, guardians, permanent legal custodians and adoptive parents gaining access to money conserved by the county agency.(11) The department and county agency shall assess the feasibility of providing repayments for a child formerly in foster care whose benefits were not used in the best interest of the child.(12) The county agency shall collect, maintain and provide data relating to the application, use and conservation of Federal and State benefits for a child in foster care in an annual report provided to the public. The report may not reveal to the public identifying information about a child either currently or formerly in foster care. COUNSELING RELATED TO MAINTAINING AND CONSERVING RSDI BENEFITS. THE COUNTY AGENCY SHALL DOCUMENT THE PROVISION OF COUNSELING UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.20250HB0151PN3690 - 7 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) (11) Conservation of the RSDI benefits shall fulfill the exhaustion of eligibility and receipt of benefits requirements under section 704.2 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(14) (12) The department and county agency may contract with a third party to fulfill any of the requirements under this section.(15) Within nine months of the effective date of this section, the Department of Human Services Office for Children, Youth and Families (13) NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT shall issue guidance on the implementation of this section. The following shall apply:(i) Not later than 30 days after the effective date of this section, the office NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT shall convene a meeting with stakeholders who shall include, at a minimum, representatives from county CHILD welfare directors , child advocacy organizations, current and former foster children and other relevant stakeholders, as determined by the department.(ii) The guidance shall include best practice guidelines for county child welfare agencies. Best practice guidelines shall include establishing procedures for the following:(A) Determining the manner and tools for conducting disability screenings for children who may be eligible for RSDI benefits. (B) Assisting in the application process for RSDI benefits for each child who, pursuant to the disability screening, is likely to be determined 20250HB0151PN3690 - 8 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eligible for benefits . (C) Requesting reconsideration and appealing adverse decisions where appropriate.(D) Informing parents and caretakers at the time a child leaves foster care of potential eligibility for benefits for the child if the child is not receiving benefits but may be eligible, upon application, to receive those benefits. INFORMING A CHILD'S PARENT OF THE NEED TO APPLY AS A REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE WHEN THE CHILD LEAVES FOSTER CARE IN ORDER FOR THE CHILD TO CONTINUE TO RECEIVE RSDI BENEFITS.(E) Informing foster children of their rights and responsibilities for the continued receipt of RSDI benefits, the sources of assistance that may be available for resolving problems foster children may have with the receipt of RSDI benefits and the process for transferring accumulated benefits.(F) Providing counties strategies for leveraging existing providers of civil legal services and leveraging funds under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 Subch. IV Pt. E ( relating to Federal Payments for Foster Care, Prevention and Permanency) to provide legal assistance to children and youth to comply with the law.SECTION 3. THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:(1) NO LATER THAN SIX MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL COMMENCE A STUDY TO DEVELOP FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS OF 20250HB0151PN3690 - 9 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE IMPLEMENTATION AND FINANCIAL IMPACT OF A PROGRAM TO SCREEN, APPLY FOR AND CONSERVE SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE.(2) AS PART OF THE STUDY UNDER THIS SECTION, THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL SEEK INPUT FROM INDIVIDUALS WITH KNOWLEDGE AND EXPERTISE IN THE SUBJECT MATTER OF THE STUDY, INCLUDING:(I) REPRESENTATIVES OF COUNTY CHILDREN AND YOUTH SOCIAL SERVICE AGENCIES.(II) REPRESENTATIVES OF THE OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.(III) STATEWIDE ADVOCATES FOCUSED ON THE CONSERVATION OF SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE BENEFITS.(IV) CHILDREN CURRENTLY IN FOSTER CARE.(V) CHILDREN FORMERLY IN FOSTER CARE.(VI) PARENTS AND GUARDIANS WITH CHILDREN CURRENTLY OR FORMERLY IN FOSTER CARE.(VII) CURRENT AND FORMER KINSHIP CAREGIVERS AND FOSTER PARENTS.(VIII) GUARDIANS AD LITEM AND LEGAL COUNSEL REPRESENTING OR ADVOCATING ON BEHALF OF CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE.(IX) FOSTER CARE PROVIDERS.(X) OTHER INDIVIDUALS DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION.(3) AS PART OF THE STUDY AND RECOMMENDATIONS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL EXAMINE POLICY, PRACTICE, FEDERAL, STATE AND LOCAL FISCAL IMPLICATIONS AND THE IMPACT ON CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE REGARDING THE FOLLOWING:20250HB0151PN3690 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) THE SCREENING AND APPLICATION OF SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE BENEFITS.(II) THE DENIAL OF A SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE APPLICATION AND THE APPEAL PROCESS.(III) THE CONSERVATION OF SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE BENEFITS PRACTICES, INCLUDING REVIEW OF TYPES OF FINANCIAL ACCOUNTS TO AVOID THRESHOLD LIMITS ON SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE.(IV) ACCOUNTING, ALLOWABLE EXPENSES AND AUDITING PRACTICES.(V) STAFFING OF ADMINISTRATIVE DUTIES, INCLUDING CONTRACTS WITH FISCAL AGENTS TO PERFORM DUTIES OF THE REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE.(VI) THE INTERSECTION OF AND IMPACT ON FUNDING UNDER TITLE IV-E OF THE SOCIAL SECURITY ACT (49 STAT. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 301 ET SEQ.) AND OTHER FEDERAL FUNDING SOURCES.(VII) THE FISCAL IMPLICATIONS TO THE COMMONWEALTH AND COUNTIES AND ALLOCATIONS FOR FUNDING TO COUNTIES TO IMPLEMENT AND SUSTAIN THE USE AND CONSERVATION OF SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE FOR CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE.(VIII) CURRENT AND NEEDED DATA COLLECTION.(IX) NATIONAL BEST PRACTICE MODELS.(4) (I) NO LATER THAN ONE YEAR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE AND MAKE AVAILABLE ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE A REPORT REGARDING THE STUDY UNDER THIS SECTION. THE STUDY SHALL INCLUDE FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS ON THE ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL IMPACT OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE APPLICATION, USE AND CONSERVATION OF SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR 20250HB0151PN3690 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE, INCLUDING ANY PROPOSED STATUTORY OR REGULATORY CHANGE.(II) THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) TO ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(A) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.(B) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE AGING AND YOUTH COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.(C) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE CHILDREN AND YOUTH COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.SECTION 4. NO LATER THAN ONE YEAR AFTER THE CONCLUSION OF THE STUDY UNDER SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT, THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES SHALL REVIEW THE RECOMMENDATIONS AND CONSIDER THE DEVELOPMENT OF A PLAN FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE APPLICATION, USE AND CONSERVATION OF SOCIAL SECURITY INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE, TO THE EXTENT COST EFFECTIVE.Section 3 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE ADDITION OF SECTION 5.1(13) OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(2) THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(3) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT JANUARY 1, 2028.20250HB0151PN3690 - 12 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324